Tennessee, session 114, SB0854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-103(5), is amended by deleting
the language "ninety (90) days" and substituting "one hundred twenty (120) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0854
001572
- 1 -